test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Pron-iiqzh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Pronoun - īʼž: # pronouns 9 'eng /est ise/fin' - full paradigm
     īʼž+Pron+Sg+Nom: [īʼž, īž]
     īʼž+Pron+Sg+Gen: eņtš
     īʼž+Pron+Sg+Par: ēņtšta
     īʼž+Pron+Sg+Dat: eņtšõn
     īʼž+Pron+Sg+Ins: eņtšõks
     īʼž+Pron+Sg+Ill: [eņtšõz, eņtšõ]
     īʼž+Pron+Sg+Ela: eņtšõst
     īʼž+Pron+Pl+Nom: eņtšõd
     īʼž+Pron+Pl+Gen: eņtšõd
     īʼž+Pron+Pl+Par: eņtšidi
     īʼž+Pron+Pl+Dat: eņtšõdõn
     īʼž+Pron+Pl+Ins: eņtšõdõks
     īʼž+Pron+Pl+Ill: eņtšiz
     īʼž+Pron+Pl+Ela: eņtšist
